Illinois, session 104th, HB418.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Privacy of Child Victims of Criminal Sexual 5Offenses Act is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 190/1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1451)7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8"Privacy of Child Victims of Criminal Sexual Offenses Act".9(Source: P.A. 84-1428.)